Utah statutes.
31A-23b-201.   Requirement of license.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Section 31A-23b-211, a person may not perform, offer to perform, or advertise any service as a navigator in the state, without:

(i)  a valid navigator license issued under this chapter; or

(ii)  a valid producer license under Subsection 31A-23a-106(2)(a) with a line of authority that permits the person to sell, negotiate, or solicit accident and health insurance.

(b)  A person may not utilize the services of another as a navigator if that person knows or should know that the other person does not have a license as required by law.

(2)  An insurance contract is not invalid as a result of a violation of this section.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

